Hawaii statutes.
[§431:11-104.1] Definitions.
The following definitions shall apply for the purposes of sections 431:11-104.2
through 431:11-104.6 only:

"Acquisition" means any agreement,
arrangement, or activity the consummation of which results in a person
acquiring directly or indirectly the control of another person, and includes,
but is not limited to, the acquisition of voting securities, the acquisition of
assets, bulk reinsurance, and mergers.

"Involved insurer" means an insurer
which either acquires or is acquired, is affiliated with an acquirer or person
acquired, or is the result of a merger. [L 1992, c 176, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next